Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.360

Probationary period.

All newly appointed or promoted officers shall serve a probationary period of one year after appointment or promotion, whereupon their probationary status shall terminate, and they shall acquire regular status in the particular grade, unless given notice in writing to the contrary by the chief prior to the expiration of the probationary period.

[ 1984 c 141 s 5; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.360. Prior: 1949 c 192 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6362-61c, part.]